02_Morphology/English_language_noun.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<noun%>
%<singular%>
%<plural%>

@U.singular_to_plural_type_1.PL@
@U.singular_to_plural_type_2.PL@
@U.singular_to_plural_type_3.PL@
@U.singular_to_plural_type_4.PL@
@U.singular_to_plural_type_5.PL@


LEXICON Root

Desk%<noun%> :Desk  T_1 ;
Table%<noun%> :Table  T_1 ;
Computer%<noun%> :Computer  T_1 ;
Car%<noun%> :Car  T_1 ;
Mug%<noun%> :Mug  T_1 ;
Jug%<noun%> :Jug   T_1 ;
Tag%<noun%> :Tag   T_1 ;
Speaker%<noun%> :Speaker  T_1 ;

Octopus%<noun%> :Octop  T_2 ;
Fungus%<noun%> :Fung T_2 ;

Glass%<noun%> :Glass   T_3 ;
Church%<noun%> :Church T_3 ;
Bush%<noun%> :Bush   T_3 ;
Buzz%<noun%> :Buzz  T_3 ;

Cherry%<noun%> :Cherr  T_4 ;
Berry%<noun%> :Berr  T_4 ;
Ferry%<noun%> :Ferr  T_4 ;
Baby%<noun%> :Bab   T_4 ;

Thief%<noun%> :Thie  T_5 ;
Shelf%<noun%> :Shel  T_5 ;
Half%<noun%> :Hal  T_5 ;


LEXICON T_1

%<singular%>: #;
@U.singular_to_plural_type_1.PL@%<plural%>:@U.singular_to_plural_type_1.PL@s # ; 

LEXICON T_2

%<singular%>:us #;
@U.singular_to_plural_type_2.PL@%<plural%>:@U.singular_to_plural_type_2.PL@i # ; 

LEXICON T_3

%<singular%>: #;
@U.singular_to_plural_type_3.PL@%<plural%>:@U.singular_to_plural_type_3.PL@es # ; 

LEXICON T_4

%<singular%>:y #;
@U.singular_to_plural_type_4.PL@%<plural%>:@U.singular_to_plural_type_4.PL@ies # ; 

LEXICON T_5

%<singular%>:f #;
@U.singular_to_plural_type_4.PL@%<plural%>:@U.singular_to_plural_type_4.PL@ves # ; 
